Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-217
Disabled person, defined.

Disabled person means any person certified by a physician to have a permanent physical impairment which limits personal mobility and results in an inability to travel unassisted more than two hundred feet without the use of a wheelchair, crutch, walker, prosthetic, orthotic, or other assistance device as allowed by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 27.